src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s35_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - bíta: # 
    bíta+V+Inf: bíta
    bíta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bítur
    bíta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: beit
    bíta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bitu
    bíta+V+Sup: bitið
